North Carolina, session 2025, HB374.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Commerce the sum of three million nine hundred fifty thousand dollars ($3,950,000) in recurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to the North Carolina Association of Regional
Councils of Governments (NCARCOG), which shall use the funds to create a financial
administration program. This program shall provide the resources to employ 32 additional
finance professionals in the 16 regional councils of governments created pursuant to
G.S. 160A-470 to assist small local governments and public authorities with returning to
compliant status. NCARCOG shall prioritize assistance funded under this section to small units
of local government and public authorities (i) with limited means and (ii) on the Unit Assistance
List issued by the Department of State Treasurer.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Safety, Division of Emergency Management, the sum of three million nine hundred
thousand dollars ($3,900,000) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to
the NCARCOG, which shall use the funds to develop, implement, and provide relief pursuant to
a disaster response plan. The plan shall include specific standards and goals for building capacity;
assisting relief efforts, including local financial administration training, assistance for applying
for federal disaster recovery funds, and technical assistance for post-disaster recovery periods to
identify and facilitate repair of infrastructure, health, safety, and rebuilding needs; and increasing
readiness and resiliency in the event of future natural disasters. NCARCOG shall consult with
the Division of Emergency Management in developing the plan required by this section, and the
Division of Emergency Management shall identify and incorporate the plan in areas where the
Division's disaster relief plans might be made more efficient or effective by collaborating and
aligning disaster response with regional councils of government.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H374-v-1*